Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5364XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 2016 Section 1. Section 80.36, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 80.36 Maximum age. 3 A person shall not be employed as a peace officer in the 4 department after attaining sixty-five sixty-seven years of age. 5